California, session 20252026, AB696.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 42450.6 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:42450.6. (a) On or before December 31, 2026, the Office of the State Fire Marshal shall convene the Lithium-Ion Car Battery Advisory Group to review, and advise the Legislature on, policies pertaining to the safety and management of lithium-ion vehicle batteries involved in an emergency situation, including, but not limited to, a battery fire, other nonfire damage to a lithium-ion vehicle battery, submerged vehicle recovery, and roadway collisions. Until July 1, 2028, the advisory group shall meet at least quarterly. The advisory group shall consult with universities and research institutions that have conducted research in the area of lithium-ion batteries, with manufacturers of electric and hybrid vehicles, and both state and local first responders.(b) The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall appoint at least one member to the advisory group from each of the following:(1) The California Environmental Protection Agency.(2) The Department of Toxic Substances Control.(3) The Office of Emergency Services.(4) A certified unified program agency.(5) An organization that represents first responders that respond to vehicle battery fires.(6) An organization that represents one or more vehicle manufacturers that produce lithium-ion battery-powered vehicles.(7) An automobile dismantler or an organization that represents one or more automobile dismantlers.(8) A lithium-ion vehicle battery manufacturer.(9) A standards-developing organization that has a focus on automotive engineering.(10) A member representing advanced recycling of electric vehicle batteries, with expertise in electric vehicle battery recovery and hazard mitigation in emergency response.(c) On or before July 1, 2028, the Lithium-Ion Car Battery Advisory Group shall develop standards, based on local, state, and national guidance and research, aimed at ensuring best standards and practices are created that allow first responders to respond to lithium-ion vehicle battery emergencies in a safe and efficient manner. In developing the standards, the advisory group shall consider both state and local solutions.(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.